Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 1 General Provisions

37-7-140.
Retention of rights and privileges by patients generally; right to due process.

Patients shall retain all rights and privileges granted other persons or citizens. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person who is receiving or has received services for alcoholism or drug abuse shall be deprived of any civil,
political, personal, or property rights or be considered legally incompetent for any purpose without due process of law.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-411, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-406.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-402.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

Cross references.

Rights of persons generally, T. 1, C. 2.

Habitual intoxication or habitual drug addiction as grounds for divorce, §

19-5-3

.

37-7-141.
Patients’ right to legal counsel.

It shall be the responsibility of the department to see that every patient is given the opportunity to secure legal counsel at his own expense to represent him in connection with private, personal, domestic, business, civil, criminal, and all other legal
matters in which he may be involved during hospitalization.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.15, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

Cross references.

Right to legal counsel generally, U.S. Const., amend. 6 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XIV.

37-7-142.
Right of patients to communicate with persons outside facility and to receive visitors; inspection, restriction, and censorship of patient correspondence; establishment by chief medical officer of regulations governing visits and use of telephones.

Each patient in a facility shall have the right to communicate freely and privately with persons outside the facility and to receive visitors inside the facility.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, each patient shall be allowed to receive and send sealed, unopened mail; and no patient’s incoming or outgoing mail shall be opened, delayed, held, or censored by the facility.

If there are reasonable grounds to believe that incoming mail contains items or substances which may be dangerous to the patient or others, the chief medical officer may direct reasonable examination of such mail and, after examination, may regulate the
disposition of such items or substances found therein. All writings must be presented to the patient within 24 hours of inspection.

The chief medical officer may apply to the court for a temporary order to restrict outgoing mail. If the court determines that probable cause exists that such mail is dangerous to the patient or others, the court may order such mail temporarily restricted,
provided that a full and fair hearing shall be held within five days after the issuance of such temporary order to determine whether or not an order of restriction for an extended time shall issue. In no event shall mail be restricted
pursuant to such temporary order for more than five days after the date of the temporary order. A full and fair hearing shall be held after the issuance of the temporary order. If, at such hearing, the patient’s outgoing mail is
determined to be dangerous to the patient or others, the court may order such mail restricted for an extended period not to exceed 30 days. Restrictions for extended periods may be renewed for additional periods not to exceed 30
days each, provided that no such restriction shall be renewed except upon a renewed finding at another full and fair hearing for each such renewal that such mail is dangerous to the patient or others.

If an injunction against the sending of mail by a patient is issued by a court, the chief medical officer shall restrict outgoing mail as provided by the order of the court.

No restriction of either incoming or outgoing mail under subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section shall exceed a period of five days, notwithstanding the authority to restrict such mail for longer periods, provided that such restrictions may be continued
as necessary for periods not to exceed five days each upon determination by the chief medical officer, prior to each continuation, that such mail continues to be dangerous to the patient or others; provided, further, that in the
case of outgoing mail, such continuation periods in the aggregate shall not exceed the restriction period authorized in the court order.

Correspondence of the patient with his attorney shall not be restricted in any manner under this Code section. Correspondence of the patient with public officials shall not be restricted in any manner under subsection (c) of this Code section.

Each time a patient’s incoming mail is ordered examined by the chief medical officer and each time a patient’s outgoing mail is ordered examined by a temporary court order, written notice of such order and notice of a right to a full and fair hearing
within five days after such temporary court order shall be served on the patient and his representatives as provided in Code Section 37-7-147. A voluntary patient may waive in writing such notice to his representatives.

The circumstances surrounding the examination of any mail under subsection (c), (d), (e), or (f) of this Code section shall be recorded on the patient’s clinical record.

The chief medical officer is authorized to establish reasonable regulations governing visitors, visiting hours, and the use of telephones by patients.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-143.
Patients’ rights in regard to personal effects; liability of facility’s employees and staff members for loss of or damage to patients’ personal effects.

A patient’s rights to his personal effects shall be respected. The chief medical officer may take temporary custody of such effects when required for medical reasons. The facility shall make reasonable efforts to assure the safety of the patient’s belongings,
but no employee or staff member shall be responsible for loss of or damage to such property where reasonable safety precautions have been taken.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.8, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-144.
Patients’ right to vote.

Each patient in a facility who is eligible to vote shall be given his right to vote in primary, special, and general elections and in referendums. The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of each facility shall permit and reasonably
assist patients:

To obtain voter registration forms, applications for absentee ballots, and absentee ballots;

To comply with other requirements which are prerequisite for voting; and

To vote by absentee ballot if necessary.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

Cross references.

Right to elective franchise generally, U.S. Const., amend. 15; Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. II; and §

1-2-6

.

Absentee voting, §

21-2-380

et seq.

37-7-145.
Employment of patients outside facilities.

If a patient wishes to be employed outside a facility and if such employment will aid in the patient’s treatment, he shall be assisted in his efforts to secure suitable employment and all benefits flowing from such employment. The department shall encourage
such employment of patients and shall promote the training of patients for gainful employment after discharge. All benefits of such employment shall accrue solely to the patient.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.10, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1.

37-7-146.
Education of children undergoing treatment in a facility.

The rights of any child under treatment in a facility to an appropriate education at public expense shall not be abridged during hospitalization; and the special educational needs of each child shall be individually considered and respected. The Department
of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities and the State Department of Education shall ensure that education is provided for all patients of school age who are hospitalized in any state owned, state operated, or any other
designated facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.11, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228.

37-7-147.
Appointment of patient representatives and guardians ad litem; notice provisions; duration and scope of guardianship ad litem.

At the time a patient is admitted to any facility under this chapter, that facility shall use diligent efforts to secure the names and addresses of at least two representatives, which names and addresses shall be entered in the patient’s clinical record.

The patient may designate one representative; the second representative or, in the absence of designation of one representative by the patient, both representatives shall be selected by the facility. If the facility is to select both representatives,
it must make one selection from among the following persons in the order of listing: the patient’s mental health care agent, legal guardian, spouse, adult child, parent, attorney, adult next of kin, or adult friend, provided that,
in the case of a patient whose representative or representatives have been appointed by the court under Code Section 37-7-62, the facility shall not select a different representative. The second representative shall also be selected
from the above list but without regard to the order of listing, provided that the second representative shall not be the person who filed the petition to have the patient admitted to the facility.

If the facility is unable to secure at least two representatives after diligent search or if the department is the guardian of the patient, that fact shall be entered in the patient’s clinical record and the facility shall apply to the court in the county
of the patient’s residence for the appointment of a guardian ad litem, which guardian ad litem shall not be the department. On application of any person or on its own motion, the court may also appoint a guardian ad litem for a
patient for whom two representatives have been named whenever the appointment of a guardian ad litem is deemed necessary for protection of the patient’s rights. Such guardian ad litem shall also act as representative of the patient
and shall have the powers granted to representatives by this chapter.

At any time notice is required by this chapter to be given to the patient’s representatives, such notice shall be served on the representatives designated under this Code section. The patient’s guardian ad litem, if any, shall likewise be served. Unless
otherwise provided, notice may be served in person or by first-class mail. When notice is served by mail, a record shall be made of the date of mailing and shall be placed in the patient’s clinical record. Service shall be completed
upon mailing.

At any time notice is required by this chapter to be given to the patient, the date on which notice is given shall be entered on the patient’s clinical record. If the patient is unable to comprehend the written notice, a reasonable effort shall be made
to explain the notice to him or her.

At the time a court enters an order pursuant to this chapter, such order and notice of the date of entry of the order shall be served on the patient and his or her representatives as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Notice of an involuntary patient’s admission to a facility shall be given to his or her representatives in writing. If such involuntary admission is to an emergency receiving facility, notice shall also be given by that facility to the patient’s representatives
by telephone or in person as soon as possible.

In every instance in which a court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for any person pursuant to the terms of this chapter, such guardianship shall be for the limited purpose stated in the order of the court and shall expire automatically after 90 days
or after a lesser time stated in the order. The responsibility of the guardian ad litem shall not extend beyond the specific purpose of the appointment.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.18, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-28/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, inserted “mental health care agent,” in the second sentence of subsection (b); substituted “first-class” for “first class” in the second sentence of subsection (d); added “or her” at the end of subsection
(e); and inserted “or her” in subsection (f) and in the first sentence of subsection (g).

Cross references.

Guardians of incapacitated adults, T. 29, C. 5.

37-7-148.
Rights of patients or representatives to petition for writ of habeas corpus and for judicial protection of rights and privileges granted by this chapter.

At any time and without notice, a person detained by a facility, a mental health care agent named in such person’s psychiatric advance directive, a legal guardian of such person, or a relative or friend on behalf of such person may petition, as provided
by law, for a writ of habeas corpus to question the cause and legality of detention and to request any court of competent jurisdiction on its own initiative to issue a writ for release, provided that, in the case of any such petition
for the release of a person detained in a facility pursuant to a court order under Code Section 17-7-130 or 17-7-131, a copy of the petition along with proper certificate of service shall also be served upon the presiding judge
of the court ordering such detention and the prosecuting attorney for such court, which service may be made by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested.

A patient or his or her representatives may file a petition in the appropriate court alleging that the patient is being unjustly denied a right or privilege granted by this chapter or that a procedure authorized by this chapter is being abused. Upon the
filing of such a petition, the court shall have the authority to conduct a judicial inquiry and to issue appropriate orders to correct any abuse under this chapter.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-406.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-402.14, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 678, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-29/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, inserted “, a mental health care agent named in such person’s psychiatric advance directive, a legal guardian of such person,” near the beginning of subsection (a); and inserted “or her” in the first
sentence in subsection (b).

Cross references.

Habeas corpus generally, T. 9, C. 14.

Penalty for malicious confinement of sane person in asylum, §

16-5-43

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

37-7-149.
Establishment of patients and staff complaint procedures; making of final decisions; complaint procedures as alternative to legal remedies.

Each facility shall establish procedures whereby complaints of the patient or complaints of the staff concerning treatment of the patient can be speedily heard, with final decisions to be made by the superintendent, the regional state hospital administrator,
or an advisory committee, whichever is appropriate. The board shall establish reasonable rules and regulations for the implementation of such procedures. However, the patient shall not be required to utilize these procedures in lieu
of other available legal remedies.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.22, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-16.

Cross references.

Reports and investigations regarding mistreatment of hospital patients, residents of long-term care facilities, and other institutions, §§ 31-7-9, 31-8-50 et seq., 31-8-80 et seq., 31-8-100 et seq.

37-7-150.
[Effective until July 1, 2023. See note.] Right to appeal orders of probate court, juvenile court, or hearing examiner; payment of costs of appeal; right of patient to subsequent appeal; right of patient to legal counsel on appeal.

The patient, the patient’s representatives, or the patient’s attorney may appeal any order of the probate court or hearing officer rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding was held, except
as otherwise provided in Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, and may appeal any order of the juvenile court rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court. The appeal to the superior court
shall be made in the same manner as appeals from the probate court to the superior court, except that the appeal shall be heard before the court sitting without a jury as soon as practicable but not later than 30 days following the
date on which the appeal is filed with the clerk of the superior court. The appeal from the order of the juvenile court to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court shall be as provided by law but shall be heard as expeditiously as
possible. The patient must pay all costs upon filing any appeal authorized under this Code section or must make an affidavit that he or she is unable to pay costs. The patient shall retain all rights of review of any order of the superior
court, the Court of Appeals, or the Supreme Court, as provided by law. The patient shall have a right to counsel or, if unable to afford counsel, shall have counsel appointed for the patient by the court. The appeal rights provided
to the patient, the patient’s representatives, or the patient’s attorney in this Code section are in addition to any other appeal rights which the parties may have, and the provision of the right for the patient, the patient’s representatives,
or the patient’s attorney to appeal does not deny the right to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to appeal under the general appeal provisions of Code Sections 5-3-2 and 5-3-3.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.19, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 13; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, §§ 3-13, 3-14/HB 927.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 37-7-150 is set out twice in this Code. This version is effective until July 1, 2023. For version effective July 1, 2023, see the following version.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after
such date.”

37-7-150.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Right to appeal orders of probate court, juvenile court, or hearing examiner; payment of costs of appeal; right of patient to subsequent appeal; right of patient to legal counsel on appeal.

The patient, the patient’s representatives, or the patient’s attorney may appeal any order of the probate court or hearing officer rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding was held, except
as otherwise provided in Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15, and may appeal any order of the juvenile court rendered in a proceeding under this chapter to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court. The appeal to the superior court
shall be made in the same manner as appeals from the probate court to the superior court, except that the appeal shall be heard before the court sitting without a jury as soon as practicable but not later than 30 days following the
date on which the appeal is filed with the clerk of the superior court. The appeal from the order of the juvenile court to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court shall be as provided by law but shall be heard as expeditiously as
possible. The patient must pay all costs upon filing any appeal authorized under this Code section or must make an affidavit that he or she is unable to pay costs. The patient shall retain all rights of review of any order of the superior
court, the Court of Appeals, or the Supreme Court, as provided by law. The patient shall have a right to counsel or, if unable to afford counsel, shall have counsel appointed for the patient by the court. The appeal rights provided
to the patient, the patient’s representatives, or the patient’s attorney in this Code section are in addition to any other appeal rights which the parties may have, and the provision of the right for the patient, the patient’s representatives,
or the patient’s attorney to appeal does not deny the right to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to appeal under the general appeal provisions of Code Section 5-3-4.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-402.19, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 13; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 37; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, §§ 3-13, 3-14/HB 927;
Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 2-29/HB 916.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 37-7-150 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2023, substituted “Code Section 5-3-4” for “Code Sections 5-3-2 and 5-3-3” at the end of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 767, § 3-1/HB 916, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to petitions for review filed in superior or state court on or after July 1, 2023.